trunk/src/buckwalter scripts/convert2hunspell/arabic.aff
FLAG num
SFX 299 Y 2
SFX 299 0 t/2,1005 . +PVSuff-at
SFX 299 0 tA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-at
SFX 346 Y 7
SFX 346 0 yh/2,1034 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 346 0 yhmA/2,1034 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 346 0 yhm/2,1034 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 346 0 yhA/2,1034 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 346 0 yhn/2,1034 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 346 0 yny/2,1034 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 346 0 ynA/2,1034 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 347 Y 1
SFX 347 0 yn/2,1034 . +IVSuff-yn
SFX 310 Y 12
SFX 310 0 wh/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 whmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 whm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 whA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 whn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 wk/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 wk/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 wkmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 wkm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 wkn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 wny/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 310 0 wnA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-uwh
SFX 317 Y 1
SFX 317 0 0/2,1054 . +Suff-0
SFX 295 Y 1
SFX 295 0 A/2,1005 . +PVSuff-A
SFX 386 Y 7
SFX 386 0 wh/2,1051 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 386 0 whmA/2,1051 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 386 0 whm/2,1051 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 386 0 whA/2,1051 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 386 0 whn/2,1051 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 386 0 wny/2,1051 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 386 0 wnA/2,1051 . +IVSuff-wh
SFX 466 Y 7
SFX 466 0 Ah/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 466 0 AhmA/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 466 0 Ahm/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 466 0 AhA/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 466 0 Ahn/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 466 0 Any/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 466 0 AnA/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 19 Y 12
SFX 19 0 Ath/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 AthmA/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 Athm/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 AthA/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 Athn/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 Atk/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 Atk/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 AtkmA/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 Atkm/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 Atkn/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 Aty/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 19 0 AtnA/2,1000 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 467 Y 5
SFX 467 0 Ak/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 467 0 Ak/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 467 0 AkmA/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 467 0 Akm/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 467 0 Akn/2,1032 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 468 Y 1
SFX 468 0 An/2,1032 . +IVSuff-An
SFX 560 Y 1
SFX 560 0 0/2,1010 . +Suff-0
SFX 407 Y 1
SFX 407 0 0/2,1044 . +IVSuff-|
SFX 585 Y 5
SFX 585 0 h/2,1041 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 585 0 hmA/2,1041 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 585 0 hm/2,1041 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 585 0 hA/2,1041 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 585 0 hn/2,1041 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 425 Y 1
SFX 425 0 n/2,1053 . +IVSuff-n
SFX 586 Y 5
SFX 586 0 k/2,1041 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 586 0 k/2,1041 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 586 0 kmA/2,1041 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 586 0 km/2,1041 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 586 0 kn/2,1041 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 293 Y 1
SFX 293 0 0/2,1005 . +PVSuff-a
SFX 595 Y 5
SFX 595 0 h/2,1062 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 595 0 hmA/2,1062 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 595 0 hm/2,1062 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 595 0 hA/2,1062 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 595 0 hn/2,1062 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 596 Y 5
SFX 596 0 k/2,1062 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 596 0 k/2,1062 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 596 0 kmA/2,1062 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 596 0 km/2,1062 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 596 0 kn/2,1062 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 86 Y 1
SFX 86 0 nA/2,1000 . +FWSuff-nA-we
SFX 402 Y 7
SFX 402 0 h/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 402 0 hmA/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 402 0 hm/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 402 0 hA/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 402 0 hn/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 402 0 ny/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 402 0 nA/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|h
SFX 291 Y 1
SFX 291 0 yn/2,1009 . +NSuff-iyna
SFX 301 Y 2
SFX 301 0 n/2,1005 . +PVSuff-n
SFX 301 0 nA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-n
SFX 167 Y 1
SFX 167 0 y/2,1001 . +FWSuff-iy-me
SFX 495 Y 1
SFX 495 0 0/2,1012 . +IVSuff-|
SFX 403 Y 1
SFX 403 0 n/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|n
SFX 323 Y 1
SFX 323 0 0/2,1057 . +Suff-0
SFX 418 Y 7
SFX 418 0 nh/2,1039 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 418 0 nhmA/2,1039 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 418 0 nhm/2,1039 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 418 0 nhA/2,1039 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 418 0 nhn/2,1039 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 418 0 nny/2,1039 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 418 0 nnA/2,1039 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 565 Y 5
SFX 565 0 h/2,1018 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 565 0 hmA/2,1018 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 565 0 hm/2,1018 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 565 0 hA/2,1018 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 565 0 hn/2,1018 . +IVSuff-h
SFX 419 Y 1
SFX 419 0 0/2,1039 . +IVSuff-~n
SFX 305 Y 6
SFX 305 0 t/2,1005 . +PVSuff-t
SFX 305 0 t/2,1005 . +PVSuff-t
SFX 305 0 t/2,1005 . +PVSuff-t
SFX 305 0 tmA/2,1005 . +PVSuff-t
SFX 305 0 tm/2,1005 . +PVSuff-t
SFX 305 0 tn/2,1005 . +PVSuff-t
SFX 280 Y 1
SFX 280 0 yn/2,1008 . +NSuff-iyna
SFX 566 Y 5
SFX 566 0 k/2,1018 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 566 0 k/2,1018 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 566 0 kmA/2,1018 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 566 0 km/2,1018 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 566 0 kn/2,1018 . +IVSuff-k
SFX 128 Y 13
SFX 128 0 ty/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tyh/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tyhmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tyhm/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tyhA/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tyhn/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tyk/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tyk/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tykmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tykm/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tykn/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 ty/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 128 0 tynA/2,1001 . +NSuff-tay
SFX 529 Y 1
SFX 529 0 A/2,1021 . +IVSuff-A
SFX 297 Y 1
SFX 297 0 0/2,1005 . +PVSuff-|
SFX 83 Y 1
SFX 83 0 ny/2,1000 . +FWSuff-niy-I
SFX 237 Y 1
SFX 237 0 |t/2,1004 . +NSuff-|t
SFX 349 Y 1
SFX 349 0 y/2,1035 . +IVSuff-y
SFX 406 Y 7
SFX 406 0 Ah/2,1044 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 406 0 AhmA/2,1044 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 406 0 Ahm/2,1044 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 406 0 AhA/2,1044 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 406 0 Ahn/2,1044 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 406 0 Any/2,1044 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 406 0 AnA/2,1044 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 533 Y 1
SFX 533 0 n/2,1016 . +IVSuff-n
SFX 350 Y 7
SFX 350 0 yh/2,1035 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 350 0 yhmA/2,1035 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 350 0 yhm/2,1035 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 350 0 yhA/2,1035 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 350 0 yhn/2,1035 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 350 0 yny/2,1035 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 350 0 ynA/2,1035 . +IVSuff-yh
SFX 551 Y 1
SFX 551 0 n/2,1025 . +IVSuff-n
SFX 165 Y 1
SFX 165 0 y/2,1001 . +FWSuff-ya
SFX 351 Y 1
SFX 351 0 yn/2,1035 . +IVSuff-yn
SFX 245 Y 11
SFX 245 0 h/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 245 0 hmA/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 245 0 hm/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 245 0 hA/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 245 0 hn/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 245 0 k/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 245 0 k/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 245 0 kmA/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 245 0 km/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 245 0 kn/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 245 0 nA/2,1004 . +NSuff-h
SFX 53 Y 24
SFX 53 0 th/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 thmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 thm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 thA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 thn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tkmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tkm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tkn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tny/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tnA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAh/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAhmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAhm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAhA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAhn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAk/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAkmA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAkm/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAkn/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAny/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 53 0 tAnA/2,1000 . +PVSuff-ath
SFX 478 Y 7
SFX 478 0 Ah/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 478 0 AhmA/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 478 0 Ahm/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 478 0 AhA/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 478 0 Ahn/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 478 0 Any/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 478 0 AnA/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 479 Y 5
SFX 479 0 Ak/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 479 0 Ak/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 479 0 AkmA/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 479 0 Akm/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 479 0 Akn/2,1033 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 480 Y 1
SFX 480 0 An/2,1033 . +IVSuff-An
SFX 105 Y 12
SFX 105 0 Ath/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 AthmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 Athm/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 AthA/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 Athn/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 Atk/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 Atk/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 AtkmA/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 Atkm/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 Atkn/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 Aty/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 105 0 AtnA/2,1001 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 150 Y 1
SFX 150 0 wA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awA
SFX 531 Y 1
SFX 531 0 0/2,1021 . +IVSuff-|
SFX 514 Y 7
SFX 514 0 Ah/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 514 0 AhmA/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 514 0 Ahm/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 514 0 AhA/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 514 0 Ahn/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 514 0 Any/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 514 0 AnA/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 515 Y 5
SFX 515 0 Ak/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 515 0 Ak/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 515 0 AkmA/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 515 0 Akm/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 515 0 Akn/2,1046 . +IVSuff-Ak
SFX 353 Y 1
SFX 353 0 y/2,1048 . +IVSuff-y
SFX 534 Y 7
SFX 534 0 nh/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 534 0 nhmA/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 534 0 nhm/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 534 0 nhA/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 534 0 nhn/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 534 0 nny/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 534 0 nnA/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nh
SFX 258 Y 12
SFX 258 0 |th/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |thmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |thm/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |thA/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |thn/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |tk/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |tk/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |tkmA/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |tkm/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |tkn/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |ty/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 258 0 |tnA/2,1003 . +NSuff-|th
SFX 536 Y 1
SFX 536 0 0/2,1016 . +IVSuff-~n
SFX 535 Y 5
SFX 535 0 nk/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nk
SFX 535 0 nk/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nk
SFX 535 0 nkmA/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nk
SFX 535 0 nkm/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nk
SFX 535 0 nkn/2,1016 . +IVSuff-nk
SFX 404 Y 7
SFX 404 0 nh/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 404 0 nhmA/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 404 0 nhm/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 404 0 nhA/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 404 0 nhn/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 404 0 nny/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 404 0 nnA/2,1031 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 396 Y 7
SFX 396 0 nh/2,1030 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 396 0 nhmA/2,1030 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 396 0 nhm/2,1030 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 396 0 nhA/2,1030 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 396 0 nhn/2,1030 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 396 0 nny/2,1030 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 396 0 nnA/2,1030 . +IVSuff-|nh
SFX 270 Y 1
SFX 270 0 tyn/2,1003 . +NSuff-tayn
SFX 161 Y 5
SFX 161 0 h/2,1001 . +FWSuff-hu-he
SFX 161 0 hmA/2,1001 . +FWSuff-hu-he
SFX 161 0 hm/2,1001 . +FWSuff-hu-he
SFX 161 0 hA/2,1001 . +FWSuff-hu-he
SFX 161 0 hn/2,1001 . +FWSuff-hu-he
SFX 153 Y 12
SFX 153 0 h/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 hmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 hm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 hA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 hn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 k/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 k/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 kmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 km/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 kn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 ny/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 153 0 nA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-0ah
SFX 151 Y 12
SFX 151 0 wh/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 whmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 whm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 whA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 whn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 wk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 wk/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 wkmA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 wkm/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 wkn/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 wny/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 151 0 wnA/2,1001 . +PVSuff-awh
SFX 477 Y 1
SFX 477 0 A/2,1033 . +IVSuff-A
SFX 236 Y 12
SFX 236 0 Ath/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 AthmA/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 Athm/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 AthA/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 Athn/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 Atk/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 Atk/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 AtkmA/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 Atkm/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 Atkn/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 Aty/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 236 0 AtnA/2,1004 . +NSuff-Ath
SFX 38 Y 11
SFX 38 0 h/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 38 0 hmA/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 38 0 hm/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 38 0 hA/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 38 0 hn/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 38 0 k/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 38 0 k/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 38 0 kmA/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 38 0 km/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 38 0 kn/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 38 0 nA/2,1000 . +NSuff-h
SFX 410 Y 7
SFX 410 0 Ah/2,1045 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 410 0 AhmA/2,1045 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 410 0 Ahm/2,1045 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 410 0 AhA/2,1045 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 410 0 Ahn/2,1045 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 410 0 Any/2,1045 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 410 0 AnA/2,1045 . +IVSuff-Ah
SFX 172 Y 1
SFX 172 0 nA/2,1001 . +FWSuff-nA-we
